Utah statutes.
77-28b-3.   Eligibility criteria for international transfer.
An offender must meet the following criteria before he may be considered for
an international transfer:
(1)  the offender is a citizen of the receiving country;
(2)  the offender consents to transfer to his country of citizenship;
(3)  the offense committed by the offender constitutes a criminal offense
under the laws of the receiving state;
(4)  the offender does not have fewer than 12 months remaining on his sentence
at the time of the application for transfer;
(5)  the offender is not under a sentence of death;
(6)  the offender does not have collateral attacks or appeals on either the
sentence or conviction pending;
(7)  all other provisions of the imposed sentence such as fines, restitution,
and penalties are paid in full;
(8)  there are no detainers, wanted notices based on criminal convictions,
indictments, informations, complaints, or parole or probation violation
allegations pending against the offender; and
(9)  the offender meets all of the eligibility requirements of the treaty with
his country.
